Illinois, session 104th, SB2925.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Wildlife Code is amended by changing 5Section 3.2 as follows: 6    (520 ILCS 5/3.2)  (from Ch. 61, par. 3.2)7    Sec. 3.2. Hunting license; application; instruction. 8Before the Department or any county, city, village, township, 9incorporated town clerk or the clerk's duly designated agent 10or any other person authorized or designated by the Department 11to issue hunting licenses shall issue a hunting license to any 12person, the person shall file the person's application with 13the Department or other party authorized to issue licenses on 14a form provided by the Department and further give definite 15proof of identity and place of legal residence. Each clerk 16designating agents to issue licenses and stamps shall furnish 17the Department, within 10 days following the appointment, the 18names and mailing addresses of the agents. Each clerk or the 19clerk's duly designated agent shall be authorized to sell 20licenses and stamps only within the territorial area for which 21the clerk was elected or appointed. No duly designated agent 22is authorized to furnish licenses or stamps for issuance by 23any other business establishment. Each application shall be   SB2925- 2 -LRB104 19136 TRT 32581 b1executed and sworn to and shall set forth the name and 2description of the applicant and place of residence.3    No hunting license shall be issued to any person born on or 4after January 1, 1980 unless that person presents the person 5who is authorized to issue the license evidence that the 6person seeking the license has held a hunting license issued 7by the State of Illinois in a prior year, or a certificate of 8competency as provided in this Section. Persons under 18 years 9of age may be issued a Lifetime Hunting or Sportsmen's 10Combination License as provided under Section 20-45 of the 11Fish and Aquatic Life Code but shall not be entitled to hunt 12alone, without the supervision of an adult age 21 or older, 13unless they have a certificate of competency as provided in 14this Section and the certificate is in their possession while 15hunting.16    The Department of Natural Resources shall authorize 17personnel of the Department or certified volunteer instructors 18to conduct courses, of not less than 10 hours in length, in 19firearms and hunter safety, which may include training in bow 20and arrow safety, at regularly specified intervals throughout 21the State. Persons successfully completing the course shall 22receive a certificate of competency. The Department of Natural 23Resources may further cooperate with any reputable association 24or organization in establishing courses if the organization 25has as one of its objectives the promotion of safety in the 26handling of firearms or bow and arrow.  SB2925- 3 -LRB104 19136 TRT 32581 b1    The Department of Natural Resources shall designate any 2person found by it to be competent to give instruction in the 3handling of firearms, hunter safety, and bow and arrow. The 4persons so appointed shall give the course of instruction and 5upon the successful completion shall issue to the person 6instructed a certificate of competency in the safe handling of 7firearms, hunter safety, and bow and arrow. No charge shall be 8made for any course of instruction except for materials or 9ammunition consumed. The Department of Natural Resources shall 10furnish information on the requirements of hunter safety 11education programs to be distributed free of charge to 12applicants for hunting licenses by the persons appointed and 13authorized to issue licenses. Funds for the conducting of 14firearms and hunter safety courses shall be taken from the fee 15charged for the Firearm Owners Identification Card.16    The fee for a hunting license to hunt all species for a 17resident of Illinois is $12. For residents age 65 or older, 18and, commencing with the 2012 license year, resident veterans 19of the United States Armed Forces after returning from service 20abroad or mobilization by the President of the United States 21as an active duty member of the United States Armed Forces, the 22Illinois National Guard, or the Reserves of the United States 23Armed Forces, the fee is one-half of the fee charged for a 24hunting license to hunt all species for a resident of 25Illinois. Veterans must provide to the Department acceptable 26verification of their service. The Department shall establish   SB2925- 4 -LRB104 19136 TRT 32581 b1by administrative rule the procedure by which such 2verification of service shall be made to the Department for 3the purpose of issuing resident veterans hunting licenses at a 4reduced fee. The fee for a hunting license to hunt all species 5shall be $1 for residents over 75 years of age. Nonresidents 6shall be charged $57 for a hunting license.7    Residents of this State may obtain a 3-year hunting 8license to hunt all species as described in Section 3.1 for 3 9times the annual fee. For residents age 65 or older and 10resident veterans of the United States Armed Forces after 11returning from service abroad or mobilization by the President 12of the United States, the fee is one-half of the fee charged 13for a 3-year hunting license to hunt all species as described 14in Section 3.1 for a resident of this State. Veterans must 15provide to the Department, per administrative rule, 16verification of their service. The Department shall establish 17what constitutes suitable verification of service for the 18purpose of issuing resident veterans 3-year hunting licenses 19at a reduced fee. 20    Nonresidents may be issued a nonresident hunting license 21for a period not to exceed 10 consecutive days' hunting in the 22State and shall be charged a fee of $35.23    Nonresidents who are immediate family members of 24landowners and who qualify for special deer, turkey, and 25combination hunting licenses under Section 3.1-6 of this Act 26may obtain deer, turkey, and combination permits for the   SB2925- 5 -LRB104 19136 TRT 32581 b1regular resident permit fee for hunting on that property after 2providing acceptable verification to the Department of Natural 3Resources. For the purposes of this paragraph "immediate 4family member" includes grandparents, parents, siblings, 5children, and grandchildren. 6    A special nonresident hunting license authorizing a 7nonresident to take game birds by hunting on a game breeding 8and hunting preserve area only, established under Section 93.27, shall be issued upon proper application being made and 10payment of a fee equal to that for a resident hunting license. 11The expiration date of this license shall be on the same date 12each year that game breeding and hunting preserve area 13licenses expire.14    Each applicant for a State Migratory Waterfowl Stamp, 15regardless of the applicant's residence or other condition, 16shall pay a fee of $15 and shall receive a stamp. The fee for a 17State Migratory Waterfowl Stamp shall be waived for residents 18over 75 years of age. Except as provided under Section 20-45 of 19the Fish and Aquatic Life Code, the stamp shall be signed by 20the person or affixed to the person's license or permit in a 21space designated by the Department for that purpose.22    Each applicant for a State Habitat Stamp, regardless of 23the applicant's residence or other condition, shall pay a fee 24of $5 and shall receive a stamp. The fee for a State Habitat 25Stamp shall be waived for residents over 75 years of age. 26Except as provided under Section 20-45 of the Fish and Aquatic   SB2925- 6 -LRB104 19136 TRT 32581 b1Life Code, the stamp shall be signed by the person or affixed 2to the person's license or permit in a space designated by the 3Department for that purpose.4    Nothing in this Section shall be construed as to require 5the purchase of more than one State Habitat Stamp by any person 6in any one license year.7    The fees for State Pheasant Stamps and State Furbearer 8Stamps shall be waived for residents over 75 years of age. 9    The Department shall furnish the holders of hunting 10licenses and stamps with an insignia as evidence of possession 11of license, or license and stamp, as the Department may 12consider advisable. The insignia shall be exhibited and used 13as the Department may order.14    All other hunting licenses and all State stamps shall 15expire upon March 31 of each year. Three-year hunting licenses 16shall expire on March 31 of the 2nd year after the year in 17which the license is issued.18    Every person holding any license, permit, or stamp issued 19under the provisions of this Act shall have it in the person's 20possession for immediate presentation for inspection to the 21officers and authorized employees of the Department, any 22sheriff, deputy sheriff, or any other peace officer making a 23demand for it. This provision shall not apply to Department 24owned or managed sites where it is required that all hunters 25deposit their license, permit, or Firearm Owner's 26Identification Card at the check station upon entering the   SB2925- 7 -LRB104 19136 TRT 32581 b1hunting areas.2    For the purposes of this Section, "acceptable 3verification" means official documentation from the Department 4of Defense or the appropriate Major Command showing 5mobilization dates or service abroad dates, including: (i) a 6DD-214, (ii) a letter from the Illinois Department of Military 7Affairs for members of the Illinois National Guard, (iii) a 8letter from the Regional Reserve Command for members of the 9Armed Forces Reserve, (iv) a letter from the Major Command 10covering Illinois for active duty members, (v) personnel 11records for mobilized State employees, and (vi) any other 12documentation that the Department, by administrative rule, 13deems acceptable to establish dates of mobilization or service 14abroad. 15    For the purposes of this Section, the term "service 16abroad" means active duty service outside of the 50 United 17States and the District of Columbia, and includes all active 18duty service in territories and possessions of the United 19States. 20(Source: P.A. 103-456, eff. 1-1-24; 104-325, eff. 1-1-26.)